src/morphology/roots/exceptions.lexc
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[WORD_ID=mennä][POS=VERB][KTN=67][VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRES][PRS=SG1][STYLE=DIALECTAL]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@meen   Clitic/Optional       ;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[WORD_ID=mennä][POS=VERB][KTN=67][VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRES][PRS=SG2][STYLE=DIALECTAL]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@meet   Clitic/Optional       ;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[WORD_ID=mennä][POS=VERB][KTN=67][VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRES][PRS=PL1][STYLE=DIALECTAL]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@meemme   Clitic/Optional       ;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[WORD_ID=mennä][POS=VERB][KTN=67][VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRES][PRS=PL2][STYLE=DIALECTAL]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@meette   Clitic/Optional       ;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[WORD_ID=mennä][POS=VERB][KTN=67][VOICE=ACT][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=SG2][STYLE=DIALECTAL]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@mee   Clitic/Optional       ;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[WORD_ID=mennä][POS=VERB][KTN=67][VOICE=ACT][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=SG2][STYLE=DIALECTAL][CLIT=S]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@mees   Clitic/Optional       ;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[WORD_ID=tulla][POS=VERB][KTN=67][VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRES][PRS=SG1][STYLE=DIALECTAL]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@tuun   Clitic/Optional       ;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[WORD_ID=tulla][POS=VERB][KTN=67][VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRES][PRS=SG2][STYLE=DIALECTAL]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@tuut   Clitic/Optional       ;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[WORD_ID=tulla][POS=VERB][KTN=67][VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRES][PRS=PL1][STYLE=DIALECTAL]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@tuumme   Clitic/Optional       ;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[WORD_ID=tulla][POS=VERB][KTN=67][VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRES][PRS=PL2][STYLE=DIALECTAL]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@tuutte   Clitic/Optional       ;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[WORD_ID=tulla][POS=VERB][KTN=67][VOICE=ACT][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=SG2][STYLE=DIALECTAL]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@tuu   Clitic/Optional       ;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[WORD_ID=tulla][POS=VERB][KTN=67][VOICE=ACT][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=SG2][STYLE=DIALECTAL][CLIT=S]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@tuus   Clitic/Optional       ;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[WORD_ID=olla][POS=VERB][KTN=67][VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRES][PRS=SG1][STYLE=DIALECTAL]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@oon   Clitic/Optional       ;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[WORD_ID=olla][POS=VERB][KTN=67][VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRES][PRS=SG2][STYLE=DIALECTAL]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@oot   Clitic/Optional       ;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[WORD_ID=olla][POS=VERB][KTN=67][VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRES][PRS=PL1][STYLE=DIALECTAL]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@oomme   Clitic/Optional       ;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[WORD_ID=olla][POS=VERB][KTN=67][VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRES][PRS=PL2][STYLE=DIALECTAL]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@ootte   Clitic/Optional       ;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[WORD_ID=olla][POS=VERB][KTN=67][VOICE=ACT][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=SG2][STYLE=DIALECTAL]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@oo   Clitic/Optional       ;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[WORD_ID=olla][POS=VERB][KTN=67][VOICE=ACT][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=SG2][STYLE=DIALECTAL][CLIT=S]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@oos   Clitic/Optional       ;
